Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.320

Revenue bonds.

(1) The proceeds of the revenue bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this subchapter and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds. If the proceeds of the revenue bonds of any series issued with respect to the cost of any nonprofit facility exceeds the cost of the nonprofit facility for which issued, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the debt service fund for the revenue bonds or used to purchase the revenue bonds in the open market.

(2) The commission may issue interim notes in the manner provided for the issuance of revenue bonds to fund nonprofit facilities prior to issuing other revenue bonds to fund such facilities. The commission may issue revenue bonds to fund nonprofit facilities that are exchangeable for other revenue bonds, when these other revenue bonds are executed and available for delivery.

(3) The principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued by the commission shall be secured by a pledge of unexpended bond proceeds and the revenues and receipts derived from the nonprofit facilities funded by the revenue bonds pursuant to financing documents. The resolution under which the revenue bonds are authorized to be issued and any financing document may contain agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance or use of the nonprofit facility covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents, purchase price payments or loan payments, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues or from revenue bond proceeds, the rights and remedies available in the event of default, and other provisions relating to the security for the bonds, all as the commission considers advisable which are not in conflict with this subchapter.

(4) All revenue bonds issued under this subchapter and any interest coupons applicable thereto are negotiable instruments within the meaning of Article 8 of the uniform commercial code, Title 62A RCW, regardless of form or character.

(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds and interim notes may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1990 c 167 s 4.]